lexc/verb/enhuige5.lexc
LEXICON Case10
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§ae§n§igeoue§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§ae§n§igeoue§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§ae§ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§ae§n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§ae§n§igeoue§t§igeoue§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§ae§ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§ae§ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^§ae§ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§ae§sz         #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§ae§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§eo§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^§ae§n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^§eo§tt§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^§eo§tt§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§eo§tt                 #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^§eo§tt§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^§eo§tt§igea§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^§eo§tt§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^§eo§tt§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^§eo§tt§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^§eo§tt§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^§eo§tt§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^§eo§tt§igeaa§t§igeo2§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^§eo§tt§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^§ae§nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg1^§ae§n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg1^§ae§n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§ae§n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§ae§n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^§ae§n§igeaa§t§igeo§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^§ae§n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^§ae§n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg1^§ae§n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg1^§ae§n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^§ae§n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^§ae§n§igeaa§t§igeo§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^§ae§n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igea§l§igea§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^§eo§tt§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^§ae§n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né
